Hawaii statutes.
§352-5.5 Criminal history record checks.
(a) The department shall develop standards to ensure the reputable and
responsible characters of staff members of the Hawaii youth correctional
facility which shall include criminal history record checks in accordance with
section 846-2.7.

(b) Staff members, as defined in section
352-5, including any new staff members, shall:

(1) Be subject to criminal history record checks in
accordance with section 846-2.7; and

(2) Provide consent to the department to obtain other
criminal history record information for verification.

New staff members shall be fingerprinted within five
working days of beginning employment for the purpose of complying with the
criminal history record check.

(c) The department shall obtain criminal
history record information through the Hawaii criminal justice data center on
all staff members and new staff members of the Hawaii youth correctional
facility. The department shall conduct an annual name inquiry into the state
criminal history record files.

(d) The department may deny employment to a
staff member or new staff member who was convicted of a crime other than a
minor traffic violation involving $50 or less and if the department finds that
because of the criminal history record of the staff member or new staff member,
the staff member poses a risk to the health, safety, security, or well-being of
youths under supervision and confinement. [L 1985, c 209, §5; am L 2003, c 95,
§10(2)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next